Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-146.08
Biological parent; revocation of nonconsent; form.

At any time after signing the notice of nonconsent provided for in section 43-146.06, the biological parent may revoke such notice. A form of revocation shall be provided by the department and shall take effect at the time of filing of the form with the department. The revocation form shall contain the following notice:

IMPORTANT NOTICE

You do not have to sign this form. If you do sign it, you are entitled to a copy of it. Your signature on this form means that the Department of Health and Human Services may at any time disclose to the adopted person any information contained on the original birth certificate of the adopted person.

Laws 1988, LB 372, § 13;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 49;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 97.